Massachusetts, session 194th, S2000.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6(r) of Chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by inserting the words “or any entity engaged primarily in
research and development activities, including limited liability companies, partnerships, and
other entities filing Massachusetts tax returns,” after the words “development by a manufacturing
corporation”.
SECTION 2. Section 6(s) of Chapter 64H, as appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
the words “or any other entity certified by the Department of Revenue as primarily engaged in
research and development activities.” after the phrase “manufacturing or research and
development corporation”
SECTION 3. The Department of Revenue shall issue guidance to assist eligible non-
corporate entities, including limited liability companies and partnerships, in applying for this
of 2

exemption. Non-corporate entities may be required to submit an annual statement confirming
their primary engagement in research and development activities.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and apply to all qualifying
purchases made on or after this date.
of 2